Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1756
Purchaser; waiver of rights; unenforceable.

Any waiver by a purchaser of the provisions of the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable. Any attempt by a seller to have a purchaser waive rights given by the act shall be a violation of the act.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 56;

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 23.